Utah statutes.
53A-3-106.   Rules of order and procedure.

(1)  As used in this section, "rules of order and procedure" means a set of rules that govern and prescribe in a public meeting:

(a)  parliamentary order and procedure;

(b)  ethical behavior; and

(c)  civil discourse.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), a local school board shall:

(a)  adopt rules of order and procedure to govern a public meeting of the local school board;

(b)  conduct a public meeting in accordance with the rules of order and procedure described in Subsection (2)(a); and

(c)  make the rules of order and procedure described in Subsection (2)(a) available to the public:

(i)  at each public meeting of the local school board; and

(ii)  on the local school board's public website, if available.

(3)  Subjection (2)(a) does not affect a local school board's duty to comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.

